Louisiana, session 2026, HB324.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:51 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§51. Salary as recommended by the Judicial Compensation Commission
A.(1) The supplement paid pursuant to and authorized by Section 5 of Act
390 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature shall terminate on June 30, 2026,
but shall be continued as a cost of living adjustment to salary effective on July 1,
2026.
(2) On July 1, 2026, after adjustment pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection and subject to the provisions of Subsection B of this Section, the actual
salary of the judges of the Louisiana Supreme Court, courts of appeal, and district
courts and the state-paid actual salary of the judges of the city courts and parish
courts shall reflect the recommended cost of living adjustment and be increased by
the amount recommended by the Judicial Compensation Commission reflecting a
total increase of less than two percent for each year since the last increase as follows:
(a) Twelve thousand one hundred twenty-nine dollars for the justices of the
Louisiana Supreme Court.
(b) Eleven thousand four hundred thirty-one dollars for the judges of the
courts of appeal.
(c) Ten thousand seven hundred twenty-three dollars for the judges of the
district courts.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 324 ENROLLED
(d) An amount for judges of the city and parish courts that would increase
the state-paid salary of the judges by the same percentage as district court judges.
(3) On July 1, 2027, the actual salary of the judges of the Louisiana Supreme
Court, courts of appeal, and district courts and the state-paid actual salary of the
judges of the city courts and parish courts shall be increased by two and seven tenths
percent.
B. The cost of living adjustment authorized pursuant to Paragraph (A)(2) of
this Section for Fiscal Year 2026-27 shall be funded by the judiciary itself upon
certification by the Louisiana Supreme Court and the Louisiana Judicial Budgetary
Control Board that the judiciary has sufficient reserves to satisfy the obligation.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.